Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.125

Petition—Notice and public hearing required.

A public hearing shall be held on the creation of a proposed local improvement district or utility local improvement district that is initiated by petition. Notice requirements for this public hearing shall be the same as for the public hearing on the creation of a proposed local improvement district or utility local improvement district that is initiated by resolution.

[ 1987 c 315 s 2.]